North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-12 Annexation, Reorganization, and Dissolution
15.1-12-26.
Dissolution of school district — Grounds.

A county committee shall initiate proceedings to dissolve a school district and attach the property to other operating high school districts in the same county, or to a non-high school district in the same county if there are no high school districts in the same county adjacent to the district being dissolved, when it is notified in writing by the county superintendent of schools whose jurisdiction includes the administrative headquarters of the district that:

The district is financially unable to effectively and efficiently educate its students;

The district has not operated a school as required by section 15.1-12-24; or

A school board has determined that dissolution is in the best interest of its students.

Except as provided in subsection 3, a county committee shall initiate proceedings under section 15.1-12-27 to attach real property to an operating high school district in the same county, or to a non-high school district in the same county if there is no high school district in the same county adjacent to the district being dissolved, when it is notified in writing by the county superintendent that:

Real property has been severed from its school district by the expansion of a city and the severed portion is not contiguous with its district; or

There exists real property that does not belong to a school district.

If a school district reorganization plan which does not include all real property in a district is approved by the electors, the county committee shall, within forty-five days after the election, hold a hearing under section 15.1-12-27 to attach the remaining property to one or more operating high school districts in the same county, or to non-high school districts in the same county if there are no high school districts in the same county adjacent to the district being dissolved.

Subject to state board approval under section 15.1-12-27, a county committee that has initiated proceedings to dissolve a school district under this section may sell, exchange, or donate property or assets of the dissolving district to another political subdivision for less than fair market value provided the dissolving district has sufficient property and assets remaining to satisfy the requirements of sections 15.1-12-28 and 15.1-12-28.1.

Receipt of notice by a county committee under this section:

Renders an annexation petition involving any real property in the district void, unless the annexation has already been approved by the state board; and

Prohibits the acceptance of a new annexation petition involving any real property in the district until all dissolution proceedings have been completed.

One or more annexation petitions may not be used to annex all of the real property in a school district to surrounding school districts.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 12; 2005, ch. 167, § 6; 2019, ch. 159, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 149, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-12-26.1.
Dissolving school district to contact job service North Dakota.

Before the hearing before the county committee, the dissolving school district shall contact job service North Dakota for its estimation of the school district’s potential obligation to job service North Dakota for reimbursement of unemployment compensation benefits that could potentially be paid by job service North Dakota to school district employees.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 159, § 3.

15.1-12-27.
Dissolution of school district — Notice — Hearing — Order of attachment.

The county superintendent shall schedule and give notice of a public hearing regarding the dissolution of the district and the subsequent attachment of the property to other high school districts in the same county, or to non-high school districts in the same county if there are no high school districts in the same county adjacent to the district being dissolved. The county superintendent shall publish the notice in the official newspaper of each county that encompasses property in the dissolving district and in the official newspaper of each county that encompasses property in a high school district adjacent to the dissolving district, or to non-high school districts in the same county if there are no high school districts in the same county adjacent to the district being dissolved, at least fourteen days before the date of the hearing. The county superintendent shall provide notice of the public hearing to the business manager of each high school district adjacent to the dissolving district, or to non-high school districts in the same county if there are no high school districts in the same county adjacent to the district being dissolved.

At the hearing, the board of the dissolving district may propose a particular manner of dissolution, including the sale, exchange, or donation of property and assets of the dissolving district to another political subdivision for less than fair market value.

The county committee shall consider testimony and documentary evidence regarding:

The value and amount of property held by the dissolving school district;

The amount of all outstanding bonded and other indebtedness;

The distribution of property and assets among the school districts to which the dissolved district is attached, or to another political subdivision as proposed by the dissolving district;

The taxable valuation of the dissolving district and adjacent school districts and the taxable valuation of adjacent school districts under the proposed manner of dissolution;

The size, geographical features, and boundaries of the dissolving district and of adjacent school districts;

The number of students enrolled in the dissolving district and in adjacent school districts;

Each school in the dissolving district and in adjacent school districts, including its name, location, condition, accessibility, and the grade levels it offers;

The location and condition of roads, highways, and natural barriers in the dissolving district and in adjacent school districts;

Conditions affecting the welfare of students in the dissolving district and in adjacent school districts;

The boundaries of other governmental entities;

The educational needs of communities in the dissolving district and in adjacent school districts;

Potential savings in school district transportation and administrative services;

The anticipated future use of the dissolving districts’ buildings, sites, and playfields;

The potential for a reduction in per student valuation disparities between the school districts to which the dissolved district is attached;

The potential to equalize or increase the educational opportunities for students from the dissolving district and for students in adjacent school districts; and

All other relevant factors.

After the hearing, the county committee shall make findings of fact. Subject to final approval by the state board, the county committee may order the district dissolved and its real property or assets:

Attached to one or more contiguous, operating high school districts in the same county;

Attached to non-high school districts in the same county if there are no high school districts in the same county adjacent to the district being dissolved; or

Sold, exchanged, or donated to another political subdivision for less than fair market value provided the dissolving district has sufficient property and assets remaining to satisfy the requirements of sections 15.1-12-28 and 15.1-12-28.1.

Any property ordered attached to other school districts under this section must have at least one minor residing within its boundaries.

The county superintendent shall forward all minutes, records, documentary evidence, and other information regarding the dissolution proceeding together with a copy of the county committee’s order to the state board for final approval of the dissolution. The state board shall publish notice of its meeting at which it will consider the dissolution, in the official newspapers of the counties required for publication under subsection 1, at least fourteen days before the meeting.

The order of dissolution becomes effective July first following approval by the state board, unless the county committee provides for a different effective date.

If the boundaries of the dissolving school district cross county lines, the proceeding to dissolve the district must be conducted jointly by the county committees representing counties containing twenty-five percent or more of the dissolving district’s taxable valuation. If, after the hearing, a majority of the county committees are unable to agree upon an order of dissolution and attachment, the county superintendent of the county in which the administrative headquarters of the dissolving school district is located shall notify the state board. The state board shall conduct a public hearing, as required in this section, and order the dissolution of the district and the attachment of its real property to adjacent school districts in the manner it deems appropriate. The state board shall publish notice of the public hearing in the official newspapers of the counties required for publication under subsection 1, at least fourteen days before the date of the hearing.

If any portion of the order providing for the attachment of real property is suspended or voided, the order of dissolution is likewise suspended or voided.

The state board shall provide a copy of its final findings of fact, conclusions of law, and order regarding the dissolution to job service North Dakota. If not otherwise included in the findings of fact, the state board shall also provide job service North Dakota with information on the distribution and valuation of property from the dissolving district to the receiving districts.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 12; 2001, ch. 172, § 5; 2005, ch. 159, § 4; 2005, ch. 167, § 7; 2013, ch. 151, § 5; 2019, ch. 159, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 149, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-12-28.
Dissolution of school district — Unobligated cash balance — Distribution.

Any unobligated cash balance not exceeding ten thousand dollars must be held in a separate fund by the auditor of the county having the greatest share of the dissolved school district’s land. The county auditor shall hold the fund for one year after the effective date of the dissolution. During that year, the county auditor shall accept assets and pay unresolved debts attributable to the dissolved school district.

After one year, the county auditor shall distribute the remaining cash balance as follows:

If the dissolving school district did not have sufficient funds for the reimbursement account set up under section 15.1-12-28.1, then as much of the remaining cash balance as would be necessary to pay the estimated obligation to job service North Dakota must be deposited in the reimbursement account. Unless otherwise directed by the order of dissolution, any remaining cash balance must be distributed to the receiving school districts in the same percentage as the taxable valuation received at the time of the attachment order.

If the reimbursement account in section 15.1-12-28.1 was fully funded by the dissolving school district, the county auditor shall distribute the remaining cash balance among the school districts to which the real property of the dissolved district was attached. Unless otherwise directed by the order of dissolution, the distribution to each shall be the same percentage as the taxable valuation at the time of the attachment order.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 12; 2005, ch. 159, § 5.

15.1-12-28.1.
Dissolving school district to set up reimbursement account for benefit of job service North Dakota — Liability of receiving school districts if funds are insufficient.

After the dissolution is approved by the state board and after ten thousand dollars is set aside as provided for in section 15.1-12-28, the school district shall set aside in a reimbursement account the amount of money estimated by job service North Dakota to reimburse job service North Dakota for unemployment compensation benefits that could potentially be paid by job service North Dakota to school district employees, as indicated in section 15.1-12-26.1. The school district shall set aside that money in a reimbursement account with the North Dakota school boards association or with the county auditor and shall notify job service North Dakota of the account’s location.

The money must be held for two and one-half years from the effective date of the dissolution and must be used to reimburse job service North Dakota for unemployment compensation benefits paid by job service North Dakota to former employees of the dissolved school district for which the dissolved school district would have been liable, including any delinquent reimbursement payments.

After the two and one-half year period, moneys remaining in the account must be distributed to the school districts that received the dissolving school district’s land, in the same proportion as taxable valuation received by the school districts.

If the money in the account is not sufficient to reimburse job service North Dakota for all unemployment compensation claims paid, then the school districts that received the dissolving school district’s land must pay the balance to job service North Dakota in the same proportion as taxable valuation received by the school districts.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 159, § 6.

15.1-12-29.
Dissolution of school district — Unobligated cash balance — Tax credits or refunds.

After ten thousand dollars is set aside, as required by section 15.1-12-28, and after the required amount is deposited in the reimbursement account for job service North Dakota, as required by section 15.1-12-28.1, any remaining unobligated cash balance, up to an amount equaling a dissolved school district’s general fund expenditure for the last school year before the district’s dissolution is a credit for real property owners within the boundaries of the dissolved school district, against taxes levied by the district to which their property is now attached. If property from the dissolved district is attached to more than one school district, the percentage of the total credit to which each eligible real property owner is entitled must equal the percentage that the taxable valuation of the individual’s real property bears to the total taxable valuation of the dissolved district’s property at the time of the attachment order.

Upon approval of the board of county commissioners, any school district required to provide a tax credit under subsection 1 may provide a cash refund in lieu of the tax credit. At the request of the county auditor, the school district holding the unobligated cash balance available under subsection 1 shall pay to the county treasurer the amount to be paid to those who own real property within the dissolved district. The treasurer shall issue the refund to the owner of the property as shown on the county’s assessment list at the time of payment. If there is a lien for unpaid taxes against the property, the treasurer shall first apply the property owner’s tax credit toward any outstanding balance. Any amount remaining may then be paid to the property owner. The cash refunds must be calculated proportionately to the total taxable value of the dissolved district during the last year taxes were levied.

After the requirements of subsection 1 have been met, the county auditor shall distribute any remaining unobligated cash balance among the school districts to which the real property of the dissolved district was attached. The percentage of the remaining unobligated cash balance to which each school district is entitled equals that percentage of the dissolved district’s total taxable valuation which was attached to the receiving school district.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 196, § 12; 2005, ch. 159, § 7; 2005, ch. 167, § 8.